New York, session 2025-2026, A6349.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subdivision 1 of section 2 105 of the civil service law, as added by chapter 790 of the laws of 3 1958, are amended and a new paragraph (d) is added to read as follows: 4 (a) by word of mouth or writing [wilfully] willfully and deliberately 5 advocates, advises or teaches the doctrine that the government of the 6 United States or of any state or of any political subdivision thereof 7 should be overthrown or overturned by force, violence or any unlawful 8 means; [or] 9 (b) prints, publishes, edits, issues or sells, any book, paper, docu- 10 ment or written or printed matter in any form, containing or advocating, 11 advising or teaching the doctrine that the government of the United 12 States or of any state or of any political subdivision thereof should be 13 overthrown by force, violence or any unlawful means, and who advocates, 14 advises, teaches, or embraces the duty, necessity or propriety of adopt- 15 ing the doctrine contained therein; [or] 16 (c) organizes or helps to organize or becomes a member of any society 17 or group of persons which teaches or advocates that the government of 18 the United States or of any state or of any political subdivision there- 19 of shall be overthrown by force or violence, or by any unlawful 20 means[.]; or 21 (d) shall stand convicted of violating section two thousand three 22 hundred eighty-six of title eighteen of the United States code. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07913-01-5